California, session 20252026, AB2015.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 155.8 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, immediately following Section 155.7, to read:155.8. (a) The department, in consultation with the Transportation Agency and local authorities, shall conduct a comprehensive study on the impact of third-party navigation applications on the state highway system and local street and road networks. The study shall specifically analyze all of the following:(1) Congestion displacement, analyzed by determining the extent to which third-party navigation applications shift congestion from state highways to local streets and the resulting changes in vehicle miles traveled.(2) Local infrastructure impact, analyzed by determining the physical toll of increased traffic volumes associated with third-party navigation applications on local road pavement conditions, and related effects on maintenance costs.(3) Safety metrics, analyzed by evaluating traffic safety on local roads affected by traffic diversion associated with third-party navigation applications, including changes in collision rates, near-miss incidents, and impacts on existing “slow streets” or pedestrian heavy zones.(4) Emergency response, analyzed by determining the effect of traffic diversion associated with third-party navigation applications on the response times of police, fire, and emergency medical services.(b) On or before January 1, 2028, the department shall submit to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature the study required pursuant to subdivision (a) and a report, based on the findings of the study, that includes policy recommendations for regulatory or legislative action to improve the alignment between third-party navigation applications and state and local traffic management goals. Recommendations in the report may include any of the following:(1) Data-sharing requirements between third-party navigation applications and local jurisdictions.(2) Frameworks for third-party navigation applications to respect local traffic ordinances, such as weight limits or local access only designations.(3) Technological standards to prioritize safety and emissions reductions over marginal time savings.(c) (1) The study and report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2032.SECTION 1.Section 21101 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21101.Local authorities, for those highways under their jurisdiction, may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution, except as provided in subdivision (f), on the following matters:(a)Closing any highway to vehicular traffic when, in the opinion of the legislative body having jurisdiction, the highway is either of the following:(1)No longer needed for vehicular traffic.(2)The closure is in the interests of public safety and all of the following conditions and requirements are met:(A)The street proposed for closure is located in a county with a population of 6,000,000 or more.(B)The street has an unsafe volume of traffic and a significant incidence of crime.(C)The affected local authority conducts a public hearing on the proposed street closure.(D)Notice of the hearing is provided to residents and owners of property adjacent to the street proposed for closure.(E)The local authority makes a finding that closure of the street likely would result in a reduced rate of crime.(b)Designating any highway as a through highway and requiring that all vehicles observe official traffic control devices before entering or crossing the highway or designating any intersection as a stop intersection and requiring all vehicles to stop at one or more entrances to the intersection.(c)Prohibiting the use of particular highways by certain vehicles, except as otherwise provided by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1031) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.(d)Closing particular streets during regular school hours for the purpose of conducting automobile driver training programs in the secondary schools and colleges of this state.(e)Temporarily closing a portion of any street for celebrations, parades, local special events, and other purposes when, in the opinion of local authorities having jurisdiction or a public officer or employee that the local authority designates by resolution, the closing is necessary for the safety and protection of persons who are to use that portion of the street during the temporary closing.(f)(1)Implementing a slow streets program. For purposes of this section, a “slow streets program” may include closures to vehicular traffic or through vehicular traffic of neighborhood local streets with connections to citywide bicycle networks, destinations, such as a business district, that are within walking distance, or green space. A local authority may implement a slow streets program by adopting an ordinance that provides for the closing of streets to vehicular traffic or limiting access and speed on a street using roadway design features, including, but not limited to, islands, curbs, or traffic barriers. A local authority may implement a slow streets program if it meets all of the following requirements:(A)Conducts an outreach and engagement process that includes notification to residents and owners of property abutting any street being considered for inclusion in the slow streets program.(B)Determines that the closure or traffic restriction leaves a sufficient portion of the streets in the surrounding area for other public uses, including vehicular, pedestrian, and bicycle traffic.(C)Provides advance notice of the closure or traffic restriction to residents and owners of property abutting the street.(D)Clearly designates the street closure or traffic restriction with signage in compliance with the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.(E)Determines that the closure or traffic restriction is necessary for the safety and protection of persons who are to use that portion of the street during the closure or traffic restriction.(F)Maintains a publically available internet website with information about its slow streets program, a list of streets that are included in the program or are being evaluated for inclusion in the program, and instructions for participating in the public engagement process.(2)Prohibiting any person, business, or other entity having ownership or control of a navigation program from providing directions to a driver that would include any of the streets in a slow streets program implemented pursuant to this subdivision. The local authority shall notify any person, business, or other entity having ownership or control of a navigation program of the streets in a slow streets program.(g)Prohibiting entry to, or exit from, or both, from any street by means of islands, curbs, traffic barriers, or other roadway design features to implement the circulation element of a general plan adopted pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 65350) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code. The rules and regulations authorized by this subdivision shall be consistent with the responsibility of local government to provide for the health and safety of its citizens.